Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-119
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 43-119 to 43-146.16, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 43-121 to 43-123.01 shall be used.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 69.